Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1 COUNTY PLANNING
30-28-118. Appeals to board of adjustment.

Appeals to the board of adjustment may be taken by any person aggrieved by his inability to obtain a building permit or by the decision of any administrative officer or agency based upon or made in the course of the administration or enforcement of the provisions of the zoning resolution. Appeals to the board of adjustment may be taken by any officer, department, board, or bureau of the county affected by the grant or refusal of a building permit or by other decision of an administrative officer or agency based on or made in the course of the administration or enforcement of the provisions of the zoning resolution. The time within which such appeal shall be made, and the form or other procedure relating thereto, shall be as specified in the general rules provided by the board of county commissioners to govern the procedure of such board of adjustment or in the supplemental rules of procedure adopted by such board.

No such appeal to the board of adjustment shall be allowed for building use violations that may be prosecuted pursuant to section 30-28-124 (1)(b).

Upon appeals the board of adjustment has the following powers:

To hear and decide appeals where it is alleged by the appellant that there is error in any order, requirement, decision, or refusal made by an administrative official or agency based on or made in the enforcement of the zoning resolution;

To hear and decide, in accordance with the provisions of any such resolution, requests for special exceptions or for interpretation of the map or for decisions upon other special questions upon which such board is authorized by any such resolution to pass;

Where, by reason of exceptional narrowness, shallowness, or shape of a specific piece of property at the time of the enactment of the regulation or by reason of exceptional topographic conditions or other extraordinary and exceptional situation or condition of such piece of property, the strict application of any regulation enacted under this part 1 would result in peculiar and exceptional practical difficulties to, or exceptional and undue hardship upon, the owner of such property, to authorize, upon an appeal relating to said property, a variance from such strict application so as to relieve such difficulties or hardship if such relief may be granted without substantial detriment to the public good and without substantially impairing the intent and purpose of the zone plan and zoning resolutions. In determining whether difficulties to, or hardship upon, the owner of such property exist, as used in this paragraph (c), the adequacy of access to sunlight for solar energy devices installed on or after January 1, 1980, may properly be considered. Regulations and restrictions of the height, number of stories, size of buildings and other structures, and the height and location of trees and other vegetation shall not apply to existing buildings, structures, trees, or vegetation except for new growth on such vegetation.

The concurring vote of four members of the board in the case of a five-member board and of three members in the case of a three-member board shall be necessary to reverse any order, requirement, decision, or determination of any such administrative official or agency or to decide in favor of the appellant.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 303, § 17.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-17.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1458, § 2, effective June 9.

L. 79:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1161, § 7, effective May 25.

30-28-119. District planning commissions.

Whether or not a county planning commission has been created, the board of county commissioners of any county which is unzoned, on petition, from time to time, may appoint district planning commissions for the purpose of preparing plans for zoning certain portions of the unincorporated territory within such county. Such petition shall:

Be signed by more than fifty percent of the qualified electors who are residents in the proposed district and more than fifty percent of the residents and nonresidents who own more than fifty percent of the area of real property situated within the boundaries of the district described in the petition;

Request the appointment of a planning commission for such district;

Contain all of the following:

A list of the parcels of land as shown in the records of the county assessor to be included within the proposed district;

A list of proposed planning commissioners; and

A map that shows the boundaries of the proposed district and the total number of acres within the proposed district and that meets the minimum standards for land surveys and plats provided in article 51 of title 38, C.R.S.;

Be submitted to the county clerk and recorder.

(1.3) The county clerk and recorder shall review the petition and prepare a report for the board of county commissioners. The board of county commissioners may adopt rules on processing the petition and establish a reasonable fee for the cost of reviewing the petition.

(1.6) At the next regular meeting following the receipt of the report, the board of county commissioners shall determine the sufficiency of the petition and, if found to be sufficient, shall order a public hearing to be held on the question of whether a planning commission for the proposed district should be appointed. The board of county commissioners shall hold the public hearing not more than sixty days after the date the petition is determined sufficient. The petitioner has the burden of proof that a planning commission for the proposed district should be appointed.

Notice of the time, place, and purpose of such hearing, containing a description of the boundaries of the proposed district, shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the county by one publication at least fourteen days prior to the date of such hearing and shall be mailed by the petitioner for the appointment of a planning commission at least fourteen days before the hearing by certified mail to each person who owns property within the proposed district as shown in the records of the county assessor.

(2.3) Any owner of property included within the boundaries of the proposed district shall be entitled to protest the appointment of a planning commission by filing with the board of county commissioners a written statement setting forth in brief the grounds of the protest or by presenting evidence of the grounds of the protest at the hearing. At the time and place specified in said notice, the board of county commissioners shall sit for the purpose of determining whether the public interest requires that a planning commission for the proposed district should be appointed. A person protesting the appointment of the planning commission for the proposed district has the burden of proof that a planning commission should not be appointed.

(2.7) At the next regular meeting after termination of the hearing, the board of county commissioners, if satisfied that the public interest requires such action, may enter an order appointing a district planning commission and may exclude parcels of land from the proposed district. The district planning commission shall consist of three or five members, each of whom shall be a resident of the district and the owner of real property situated therein.

The members of such commission shall serve for terms of not more than three years as determined by the board of county commissioners. They shall serve without compensation. The board of county commissioners shall provide for the filling of vacancies in the membership of the commission and for the removal of a member for nonperformance of duty or misconduct.

The district planning commission:

Has all the powers and is subject to all the duties by this part 1 conferred and imposed upon county planning commissions insofar as such powers and duties relate to zoning and in respect to the territory included within the boundaries of such proposed district;

Shall develop proposed plans and regulations for the zoning of the proposed district; and

Shall hold public hearings and certify a copy of the proposed zoning plans, including the full text of the zoning resolution and the maps, to the board of county commissioners of the county, and, if a county planning commission has been created in the county wherein the said district is situated, such plans must first be reviewed by the commission.

After receiving the certification of said zoning plans from the commission and before the creation of the planning district and adoption of any zoning resolutions, the board of county commissioners shall hold a public hearing in the manner prescribed in section 30-28-112 on the question of establishing the planning district. Notice of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing shall be made in the same manner as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Any property owner within the proposed district may protest inclusion of the owner's property within the district by filing with the board of county commissioners a written statement setting forth briefly the grounds of the protest or by presenting evidence of the grounds of the protest at the hearing. The owner has the burden of proof that the public interest requires exclusion of the owner's property from the district. The board of county commissioners may exclude any parcel of land from the proposed district if the board determines it is within the public interest.

If the board of county commissioners determines it is in the public interest, the board may:

Enter an order after the hearing that establishes the planning district, describes the boundaries of the district, and gives the district an appropriate and distinctive name;

By resolution, adopt all or any part of the proposed zoning plan and regulations; and

By resolution, exercise, as to the territory included within the boundaries of such district, all the powers conferred upon it by law.

The zoning regulations established for the district may be administered in the same manner as all other land use regulations of the county or as otherwise provided in the district zoning regulations.

Wherever the regulations for a district made pursuant to this section require a greater width or size of yards, courts, or other open spaces, require a lower height of buildings or smaller number of stories, require a greater setback from a road or street, require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required in or under any other regulations made under the authority of this part 1 and effective within the same territory, the provisions of the regulations for such district made pursuant to this section shall govern. Wherever the provisions of other regulations made under the authority of this part 1 and effective within the territory of a district established pursuant to this section impose higher standards than are imposed by the regulations for such district made pursuant to this section, the provisions of such other regulations shall govern.

The boundaries of a planning district may be increased or decreased from time to time through the addition or deletion of contiguous property by order of the board of county commissioners pursuant to petition signed by the owners of more than fifty percent of the area of the real property to be added or deleted or on motion of the board of county commissioners after published notice, opportunity for protest, and hearing, as provided in the case of original establishment of a district.

Planning districts may be dissolved by action of the board of county commissioners if the affected county adopts a zoning resolution which covers the district in question. Action for dissolution may also be initiated by a petition calling for dissolution of the district signed by more than fifty percent of the qualified electors who are residents in the district and more than fifty percent of the residents and nonresidents who own more than fifty percent of the area of real property situated within the boundaries of the district or by the board of county commissioners. The board shall hold a public hearing at the county seat within the county on the question of the dissolution of the district. A notice of the time, place, and purpose of such hearing, containing a description of the boundaries of the district, shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the county by one publication at least fourteen days prior to the date of such hearing. Prior to the hearing, the county planning commission shall review the proposed dissolution at a public meeting and shall transmit its findings to the board of county commissioners. Any owner of property included within the boundaries of the proposed district shall be entitled to protest the dissolution by filing with the board of county commissioners a written statement setting forth in brief the grounds of the protest or by providing evidence on the grounds of the protest at the hearing. At the time and place specified in said notice, the board of county commissioners shall sit for the purpose of determining whether or not such district should be dissolved, and, at such time and place, it shall consider and pass upon any protests filed. The board of county commissioners, if satisfied that the public interest would be served by such action, shall enter an order dissolving the planning district, or, if satisfied that the public interest would be served by retaining such district, the board shall enter an order dismissing such petition.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 304, § 18.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-18.

L. 65:

p. 916, § 1.

L. 74:

(1), (5), and (6) amended, p. 332, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 583, § 1, effective April 7.

30-28-120. Existing structures - county property.

The lawful use of a building or structure or the lawful use of any land, as existing and lawful at the time of the adoption of a zoning resolution or, in the case of an amendment of a resolution, at the time of such amendment, may be continued, although such use does not conform with the provisions of such resolution or amendment, and such use may be extended throughout the same building if no structural alteration of such building is proposed or made for the purpose of such extension. The addition of a solar energy device or a device used as part of a system that uses geothermal energy for water heating or space heating or cooling to such building shall not necessarily be considered a structural alteration. The board of county commissioners may provide in any zoning resolution for the restoration, reconstruction, extension, or substitution of nonconforming uses upon such terms and conditions as may be set forth in the zoning resolution.

If any county acquires title to any property by reason of tax delinquency and such property is not redeemed as provided by law, the future use of such property shall be in conformity with the then provisions of the zoning resolution of the county, or with any amendment of such resolution, equally applicable to other like properties within the district in which the property acquired by the county is located.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 306, § 19.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-19.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1162, § 8, effective May 25.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2667, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-118), ch. 335, p. 2372, § 7, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 420, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

30-28-121. Temporary regulations.

The board of county commissioners of any county, after appointment of a county or district planning commission and pending the adoption by such commission of a zoning plan, where in the opinion of the board conditions require such action, may promulgate, by resolution without a public hearing, regulations of a temporary nature, to be effective for a limited period only and in any event not to exceed six months, prohibiting or regulating in any part or all of the unincorporated territory of the county or district the erection, construction, reconstruction, or alteration of any building or structure used or to be used for any business, residential, industrial, or commercial purpose.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 306, § 20.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-20.

L. 74:

Entire section amended, p. 354, § 2, effective May 17.

30-28-122. Submission to division of planning.

Before finally adopting and certifying any plan, either master or zoning, the planning commission, regional, county, or district, making such plan shall submit such plan to the division of planning of the department of local affairs for advice and recommendations. The director of the division of planning, within thirty days after such submission, shall present his advice and criticism in respect to such plan. Such advice and criticism shall be advisory only, and the commission submitting such plan shall not be bound thereby. If such advice and criticism have not been presented within such period of thirty days, the approval of such plan by the director of the division of planning shall be presumed.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 307, § 21.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-21.

L. 63:

p. 145, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-21.

L. 67:

p. 468, § 13.

L. 71:

p. 1061, § 3.

30-28-123. Higher standards govern.

Wherever the regulations made under authority of this part 1 require a greater width or size of yards, courts, or other open spaces, or require a lower height of buildings or smaller number of stories, or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required in or under any other statute, the provisions of the regulations made under authority of this part 1 shall govern. Wherever the provisions of any other statute require a greater width or size of yards, courts, or other open spaces, or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required by the regulations made under authority of this part 1, the provisions of such statute shall govern.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 308, § 23.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-22.

30-28-124. Penalties.

It is unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, or alter any building or structure in violation of any regulation in, or of any provisions of, any zoning resolution, or any amendment thereof, enacted or adopted by the board of county commissioners under the authority of this part 1. Any person, firm, or corporation violating any such regulation, provision, or amendment thereof, or any provision of this part 1 commits a civil infraction. Each day during which such illegal erection, construction, reconstruction, or alteration continues shall be deemed a separate offense.

It is unlawful to use any building, structure, or land in violation of any regulation in, or of any provision of, any zoning resolution, or any amendment thereto, enacted or adopted by any board of county commissioners under the authority of this part 1. Any person, firm, or corporation violating any such regulation, provision, or amendment commits a civil infraction. Each day during which such illegal use of any building, structure, or land continues shall be deemed a separate offense.

Whenever a county zoning official authorized pursuant to section 30-28-114 has personal knowledge of any violation of this paragraph (b), he or she shall give written notice to the violator to correct the violation within ten days after the date of the notice. Should the violator fail to correct the violation within the ten-day period, the zoning official may request that the sheriff of the county issue a summons and complaint to the violator, stating the nature of the violation with sufficient particularity to give notice of the charge to the violator. The summons and complaint shall require that the violator appear in county court at a definite time and place stated therein to answer and defend the charge.

One copy of said summons and complaint shall be served upon the violator by the sheriff of the county in the manner provided by law for the service of a criminal summons. One copy each shall be retained by the sheriff and the county zoning official, and one copy shall be transmitted by the sheriff to the clerk of the county court.

It is the responsibility of the county attorney to enforce the provisions of this subsection (1). In the event that there is no county attorney or in the event that the board of county commissioners deems it appropriate, the board of county commissioners may appoint the district attorney of the judicial district to perform such enforcement duties in lieu of the county attorney.

In case any building or structure is or is proposed to be erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, or used, or any land is or is proposed to be used, in violation of any regulation or provision of any zoning resolution, or amendment thereto, enacted or adopted by any board of county commissioners under the authority granted by this part 1, the county attorney of the county in which such building, structure, or land is situated, in addition to other remedies provided by law, may institute an injunction, mandamus, abatement, or other appropriate action or proceeding to prevent, enjoin, abate, or remove such unlawful erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, or use. In the event that there is no county attorney or in the event that the board of county commissioners deems it appropriate, the board of county commissioners may appoint the district attorney of the judicial district to perform such enforcement duties in lieu of the county attorney.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 308, § 24.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-23.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1459, § 3, effective June 9.

L. 2006:

(1)(b)(II) amended, p. 233, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) and (1)(b)(I) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3249, § 509, effective March 1, 2022.

30-28-124.5. County court actions for civil penalties for zoning violations.

It is unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, alter, or use any building, structure, or land in violation of any regulation in, or of any provisions of, any zoning resolution or any amendment thereof, enacted or adopted by the board of county commissioners under the authority of this part 1. In addition to any penalties imposed pursuant to section 30-28-124, any person, firm, or corporation violating any such regulation, provision, or amendment thereof or any provision of this part 1 may be subject to the imposition, by order of the county court, of a civil penalty in an amount of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars. It is within the discretion of the county attorney to determine whether to pursue the civil penalties set forth in this section, the remedies set forth in section 30-28-124, or both. Each day after the issuance of the order of the county court during which such unlawful activity continues shall be deemed a separate violation and shall, in accordance with the subsequent provisions of this section, be the subject of a continuing penalty in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for each such day. Until paid, any civil penalty ordered by the county court and assessed under this subsection (1) shall, as of recording, be a lien against the property on which the violation has been found to exist. In case the assessment is not paid within thirty days, it may be certified by the county attorney to the county treasurer, who shall collect the assessment, together with a ten percent penalty for the cost of collection, in the same manner as other taxes are collected. The laws of this state for assessment and collection of general taxes, including the laws for the sale and redemption of property for taxes, shall apply to the collection of assessments pursuant to this subsection (1). Any lien placed against the property pursuant to this subsection (1) shall be recorded with the clerk and recorder of the county in which the property is located.

In the event any building or structure is erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, or used or any land is used in violation of any regulation or provision of any zoning resolution, or amendment thereto, enacted or adopted by any board of county commissioners under the authority granted by this part 1, the county attorney of the county in which such building, structure, or land is situated, in addition to other remedies provided by law, may commence a civil action in county court for the county in which such building, structure, or land is situated, seeking the imposition of a civil penalty in accordance with the provisions of this section.

A county zoning official designated by resolution of the board of county commissioners shall, upon personal information and belief that a violation of any regulation or provision of any zoning resolution enacted under the authority of this part 1 has occurred, give written notice to the violator to correct the violation within ten days after the date of the notice. If the violator fails to correct the violation within the ten-day period or within any extension period granted by the zoning official, the zoning official, the sheriff of the county, or the county attorney may issue a summons and complaint to the violator, stating the nature of the violation with sufficient particularity to give notice of the charge to the violator.

One copy of the summons and complaint issued pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) shall be served upon the violator in the manner provided by law for the service of a county court civil summons and complaint in accordance with the Colorado rules of county court civil procedure. The summons and complaint shall also be filed with the clerk of the county court and thereafter the action shall proceed in accordance with the Colorado rules of county court civil procedure.

If the county court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that a violation of any regulation or provision of a zoning resolution, or amendment thereto, as enacted and adopted by the board of county commissioners, has occurred, the court shall order the violator to pay a civil penalty in an amount allowed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The penalty shall be payable immediately by the violator to the county treasurer. In the event that the alleged violation has been cured or otherwise removed and the violator has notified the county zoning official of the cure or removal at least five business days prior to the appearance date in the summons, then the county attorney shall so inform the court and request that the action be dismissed without fine or appearance of the defendant.

Upon the filing with the court of a receipt issued by the county treasurer showing payment in full of a civil penalty assessed pursuant to this section and upon the filing of an affidavit of the county zoning official that the violation has been cured, removed, or corrected, the court shall dismiss the action and issue a satisfaction in full of the judgment so entered. The court may also dismiss the action upon a motion of the county attorney indicating that the matter has been otherwise resolved.

If a receipt showing full payment of the civil penalty or the affidavit or the motion by the county attorney required by subsection (3) of this section is not filed, the action shall continue and the court shall retain jurisdiction to impose an additional penalty against the violator in the amount specified in subsection (1) of this section. The additional penalty shall be imposed by the court upon motion filed by the county and proof that the violation has not been cured, removed, or corrected. Thereafter, the action shall continue until the filing with the court of a receipt issued by the county treasurer showing payment in full of the civil penalty and any additional penalties so assessed and the filing of an affidavit of the county zoning official that the violation has been cured, removed, or corrected, or until a motion by the county attorney to dismiss the action is granted by the court.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 338, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1), (2)(b), (2)(d), (3), and (4) amended, p. 233, § 2, effective July 1.

30-28-125. Filing with county clerk and recorder.

Upon the adoption of any zoning ordinance or regulation, or map, the board of county commissioners shall file a certified copy of each in the office of the county clerk and recorder, which copies shall be accessible to the public. The county clerk and recorder shall index such ordinances and regulations as nearly as possible in the same manner as he indexes instruments pertaining to the title of land.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 309, § 25.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-24.

30-28-126. Appropriation authorized.

The board of county commissioners is empowered to appropriate out of the general county fund such moneys, otherwise unappropriated, as it may deem fit to finance the work of the county and district planning commissions and of the boards of adjustment, and to enforce the zoning regulations and restrictions which are adopted, and to accept grants of money and service for these purposes and other purposes, in accordance with this part 1, from either private or public sources, state or federal.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 309, § 26.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-25.

30-28-127. Public utilities exceptions.

None of the provisions of this part 1 shall apply to any existing building, structure, or plant or other equipment owned or used by any public utility. After the adoption of a plan, all extensions, betterments, or additions to buildings, structures, or plant or other equipment of any public utility shall only be made in conformity with such plan, unless, after public hearing first had, the public utilities commission orders that such extensions, betterments, or additions to buildings, structures, or plant or other equipment are reasonable and that such extensions, betterments, or additions may be made even though they conflict with the adopted plan.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 309, § 27.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-26.

30-28-128. Term of membership.

In order to ensure adequate time for the preparation of those plans which are specified as the primary responsibility of a regional planning commission, the term of membership of any governing body in a regional planning commission shall be not less than three years.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 622, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-28.

30-28-129. Inclusion of land in regional planning commission.

Any county or municipality adjacent to an area under the jurisdiction of a regional planning commission may be included in such regional planning commission by agreement between its board of county commissioners, or governing body, or in charter cities the officials having charge of public improvements and the governing bodies which are members of the regional planning commission. Any such county or municipality, upon being included in the regional planning commission, shall be subject to all provisions of this part 1 relating to regional planning commissions.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 623, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-29.

30-28-130. Notice of intent to withdraw.

Written notice of intent to withdraw shall be given to the regional planning commission at least ninety days prior to the date of intended withdrawal, and no withdrawal shall be effective until such notice has been given. In the event of withdrawal of a county or municipality, no refund shall be made of any moneys paid to the regional planning commission.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 623, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-30.

30-28-131. Planning commission responsibilities in a common geographic area.

The regional planning commission shall have primary responsibility for those broad plans described in section 30-28-106 (3) and surveys and studies described in section 30-28-107 which clearly affect the physical development of two or more governmental units. The district, county, or municipal planning commission shall have primary responsibility for all other plans, surveys, and studies and implementation thereof in zoning, subdivision, housing, recreation, transportation, public works, health and safety, and other similar subjects.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 623, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-31.

30-28-132. Concurrent planning jurisdiction - authorized agreements and contracts.

In any instance where a regional planning commission is unable to perform on time and in sufficient detail a plan or survey or study which is its primary responsibility and where such plan or survey or study has been requested and is urgent for the development of a district, county, or municipality, then, upon formal notice to the regional planning commission, the local commission may proceed to make such plan or survey or study for its own area. In such instances, the regional planning commission may adopt such plan or survey or study as part of its regional plan and may take primary responsibility for the expansion of the study or plan into other jurisdictions.

A regional planning commission may agree or contract with any governmental or quasi-governmental body within the region to make any plan or survey or study for such governmental or quasi-governmental body, irrespective of whether such plan or survey or study is the primary responsibility of such regional planning commission.

A regional planning commission may agree or contract with any constituent government to have it make any plan or survey or study which is the primary responsibility of the regional planning commission.

Source:

L. 59:

p. 623, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-33.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-32.